Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AMERICAN INDIAN OPPORTUNITIES AND INDUSTRIALIZATION CENTER; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the American Indian Opportunities and Industrialization Center for workforce development programming. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end